Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-934
Cemetery; existing cemetery association; transfer to; conditions.

In any city of the second class or village in which there exists a duly perfected cemetery association as defined in section 12-501, if the cemetery association proposes to the mayor and city council or to the chairperson and village board of trustees by means of a resolution duly enacted by such cemetery association, signed by its president and attested by its secretary, signifying the willingness of the cemetery association to exercise control and management of any cemetery belonging to such city or village, then the mayor and city council or chairperson and village board of trustees shall submit at the next regular municipal election the question of the management and control over the cemetery under the conveyance made by the proper authorities of such city or village. If a majority of the votes cast at such election are in favor of the transfer of the management and control of the cemetery belonging to such city or village to the cemetery association, the management and control of such cemetery shall be relinquished forthwith by the proper authorities of such city or village to the cemetery association. If the real estate of the cemetery of such city or village has been acquired by gift or devise, the relinquishment of the management and control to the cemetery association shall be subject to the conditions imposed by the donor; and upon acceptance by the president and secretary of the cemetery association, the conditions shall be binding upon the cemetery association.

Laws 1929, c. 46, § 8, p. 198;

C.S.1929, § 17-548;

R.S.1943, § 17-934;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 267.